Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,226
Owner or operator; information to health professionals; confidentiality.

(1) An owner or operator of a facility which is subject to the requirements of section 81-15,223, 81-15,224, or 81-15,225 and the requirements of Title III shall provide the specific chemical identity, if known, of a hazardous chemical, an extremely hazardous substance, or a toxic chemical to any health professional who requests such information in writing if the health professional provides a written statement of need under this subsection and a written confidentiality agreement under subsection (5) of this section. The written statement of need shall be a statement that the health professional has a reasonable basis to suspect that:

(a) The information is needed for purposes of diagnosis or treatment of an individual;

(b) The individual or individuals being diagnosed or treated have been exposed to the chemical concerned; and

(c) Knowledge of the specific chemical identity of such chemical will assist in diagnosis or treatment.

Following such a written request, the owner or operator to whom such request is made shall promptly provide the requested information to the health professional. The authority to withhold the specific chemical identity of a chemical under section 322 of Title III when such information is a trade secret shall not apply to information required to be provided under this subsection subject to subsection (5) of this section.

(2) An owner or operator of a facility which is subject to the requirements of section 81-15,223, 81-15,224, or 81-15,225 and Title III shall provide a copy of a material safety data sheet, an inventory form, or a toxic chemical release form, including the specific chemical identity, if known, of a hazardous chemical, an extremely hazardous substance, or a toxic chemical, to any treating physician or nurse who requests such information if such physician or nurse determines:

(a) A medical emergency exists;

(b) The specific chemical identity of the chemical concerned is necessary for or will assist in emergency or first-aid diagnosis or treatment; and

(c) The individual or individuals being diagnosed or treated have been exposed to the chemical concerned.

Immediately following such a request, the owner or operator to whom such request is made shall provide the requested information to the physician or nurse. The authority to withhold the specific chemical identity of a chemical under section 322 of Title III regarding trade secrets from a material safety data sheet, an inventory form, or a toxic chemical release form shall not apply to information required to be provided to a treating physician or nurse under this subsection. No written confidentiality agreement or statement of need shall be required as a precondition of such disclosure, but the owner or operator disclosing such information may require a written confidentiality agreement in accordance with subsection (5) of this section and a statement setting forth the items listed in subdivisions (2)(a) through (2)(c) of this section as soon as circumstances permit.

(3) An owner or operator of a facility which is subject to the requirements of section 81-15,223, 81-15,224, or 81-15,225 and Title III shall provide the specific chemical identity, if known, of a hazardous chemical, an extremely hazardous substance, or a toxic chemical to any health professional:

(a) Who is a local or state government employee or a person under contract with the local or state government; and

(b) Who requests such information in writing and provides a written statement of need under subsection (4) of this section and a written confidentiality agreement under subsection (5) of this section.

Following such a written request, the owner or operator to whom such request is made shall promptly provide the requested information to the local or state health professional. The authority to withhold the specific chemical identity of a chemical under section 322 of Title III when such information is a trade secret shall not apply to information required to be provided under this subsection subject to subsection (5) of this section.

(4) The written statement of need shall be a statement that describes with reasonable detail one or more of the following health needs for the information:

(a) To assess exposure of persons living in a local community to the hazards of the chemical concerned;

(b) To conduct or assess sampling to determine exposure levels of various population groups;

(c) To conduct periodic medical surveillance of exposed population groups;

(d) To provide medical treatment to exposed individuals or population groups;

(e) To conduct studies to determine the health effects of exposure; and

(f) To conduct studies to aid in the identification of a chemical that may reasonably be anticipated to cause an observed health effect.

(5) Any person obtaining information under subsection (1) or (3) of this section shall be required to agree in a written confidentiality agreement that he or she will not use the information for any purpose other than the health needs asserted in the statement of need except as may otherwise be authorized by the terms of the agreement or by the person providing such information. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the parties to a confidentiality agreement from pursuing any remedies to the extent permitted by law.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 36.